Florida, session 2026, SB1398.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 304 305 Section 1.âParagraph (l) of subsection (2) of section 306 212.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 307 212.08âSales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and 308 storage tax; specified exemptions.âThe sale at retail, the 309 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the 310 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following 311 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this 312 chapter. 313 (2)âEXEMPTIONS; MEDICAL.â 314 (l)âMarijuana and marijuana delivery devices, as defined in 315 s. 381.986, are exempt from the taxes imposed under this chapter 316 if they are purchased by a qualified patient or a caregiver, as 317 those terms are defined in s. 381.986. 318 Section 2.âParagraphs (e) through (i), (k), and (l) of 319 subsection (1), paragraph (b) of subsection (3), paragraph (f) 320 of subsection (4), paragraphs (a) and (f) of subsection (5), 321 paragraph (b) of subsection (6), subsections (8) through (12), 322 paragraphs (a), (b), (c), and (f) of subsection (14), and 323 subsection (17) of section 381.986, Florida Statutes, are 324 amended to read: 325 381.986âMedical use of marijuana.â 326 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 327 (e)ââEdiblesâ means commercially produced food items made 328 with marijuana oil, but no other form of marijuana, which that 329 are produced and dispensed by a medical marijuana treatment 330 center (MMTC). 331 (f)ââLow-THC cannabisâ means a plant of the genus Cannabis, 332 the dried flowers of which contain 0.8 percent or less of 333 tetrahydrocannabinol and more than 10 percent of cannabidiol 334 weight for weight; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from 335 any part of such plant; or any compound, manufacture, salt, 336 derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant or its seeds 337 or resin which that is dispensed from an MMTC a medical 338 marijuana treatment center. 339 (g)ââMarijuanaâ means all parts of any plant of the genus 340 Cannabis, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin 341 extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, 342 manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the 343 plant or its seeds or resin, including low-THC cannabis, which 344 is are dispensed from an MMTC a medical marijuana treatment 345 center for medical use by a qualified patient. 346 (h)ââMarijuana delivery deviceâ means an object used, 347 intended for use, or designed for use in preparing, storing, 348 ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing marijuana into the 349 human body, and which object is dispensed from an MMTC a medical 350 marijuana treatment center for medical use by a qualified 351 patient; however, such objects except that delivery devices 352 intended solely for the medical use of marijuana by smoking need 353 not be dispensed from an MMTC and a medical marijuana treatment 354 center in order to qualify as marijuana delivery devices. 355 (i)ââMarijuana testing laboratoryâ means a facility 356 certified by the department pursuant to s. 381.988 which that 357 collects and analyzes marijuana samples from an MMTC a medical 358 marijuana treatment center and has been certified by the 359 department pursuant to s. 381.988. 360 (k)ââMedical useâ means the acquisition, possession, use, 361 delivery, transfer, or administration of marijuana authorized by 362 a physician certification. The term does not include: 363 1.âPossession, use, or administration of marijuana that was 364 not purchased or acquired from an MMTC a medical marijuana 365 treatment center. 366 2.âPossession, use, or administration of marijuana in the 367 form of commercially produced food items other than edibles or 368 of marijuana seeds. 369 3.âUse or administration of any form or amount of marijuana 370 in a manner that is inconsistent with the qualified physicianâs 371 directions or physician certification. 372 4.âTransfer of marijuana to a person other than the 373 qualified patient for whom it was authorized or the qualified 374 patientâs caregiver on behalf of the qualified patient. 375 5.âUse or administration of marijuana in the following 376 locations: 377 a.âOn any form of public transportation, except for low-THC 378 cannabis not in a form for smoking. 379 b.âIn any public place, except for low-THC cannabis not in 380 a form for smoking. 381 c.âIn a qualified patientâs place of employment, except 382 when permitted by his or her employer. 383 d.âIn a state correctional institution, as defined in s. 384 944.02, or a correctional institution, as defined in s. 944.241. 385 e.âOn the grounds of a preschool, primary school, or 386 secondary school, except as provided in s. 1006.062. 387 f.âIn a school bus, a vehicle, an aircraft, or a motorboat, 388 except for low-THC cannabis not in a form for smoking. 389 6.âThe smoking of marijuana in an enclosed indoor workplace 390 as defined in s. 386.203(5). 391 (l)ââPhysician certificationâ means a qualified physicianâs 392 authorization for a qualified patient to receive marijuana and a 393 marijuana delivery device from an MMTC a medical marijuana 394 treatment center. 395 (3)âQUALIFIED PHYSICIANS AND MEDICAL DIRECTORS.â 396 (b)âA qualified physician may not be employed by, or have 397 any direct or indirect economic interest in, an MMTC a medical 398 marijuana treatment center or a marijuana testing laboratory. 399 (4)âPHYSICIAN CERTIFICATION.â 400 (f)âA qualified physician may not issue a physician 401 certification for more than three 70-day supply limits of 402 marijuana or more than six 35-day supply limits of marijuana in 403 a form for smoking. The department shall quantify by rule a 404 daily dose amount with equivalent dose amounts for each 405 allowable form of marijuana dispensed by an MMTC a medical 406 marijuana treatment center. The department shall use the daily 407 dose amount to calculate a 70-day supply. 408 1.âA qualified physician may request an exception to the 409 daily dose amount limit, the 35-day supply limit of marijuana in 410 a form for smoking, and the 4-ounce possession limit of 411 marijuana in a form for smoking established in paragraph 412 (14)(a). The request must shall be made electronically on a form 413 adopted by the department in rule and must include, at a 414 minimum: 415 a.âThe qualified patientâs qualifying medical condition. 416 b.âThe dosage and route of administration that was 417 insufficient to provide relief to the qualified patient. 418 c.âA description of how the patient will benefit from an 419 increased amount. 420 d.âThe minimum daily dose amount of marijuana that would be 421 sufficient for the treatment of the qualified patientâs 422 qualifying medical condition. 423 2.âA qualified physician must provide the qualified 424 patientâs records upon the request of the department. 425 3.âThe department shall approve or disapprove the request 426 within 14 days after receipt of the complete documentation 427 required by this paragraph. The request is shall be deemed 428 approved if the department fails to act within this time period. 429 (5)âMEDICAL MARIJUANA USE REGISTRY.â 430 (a)âThe department shall create and maintain a secure, 431 electronic, and online medical marijuana use registry for 432 physicians, patients, and caregivers as provided under this 433 section. The medical marijuana use registry must be accessible 434 to law enforcement agencies, qualified physicians, and MMTCs 435 medical marijuana treatment centers to verify the authorization 436 of a qualified patient or a caregiver to possess marijuana or a 437 marijuana delivery device and record the marijuana or marijuana 438 delivery device dispensed. The medical marijuana use registry 439 must also be accessible to practitioners licensed to prescribe 440 prescription drugs to ensure proper care for patients before 441 medications that may interact with the medical use of marijuana 442 are prescribed. The medical marijuana use registry must prevent 443 an active registration of a qualified patient by multiple 444 physicians. 445 (f)âThe department may revoke the registration of a 446 qualified patient or caregiver who cultivates marijuana or who 447 acquires, possesses, or delivers marijuana from any person or 448 entity other than an MMTC a medical marijuana treatment center. 449 (6)âCAREGIVERS.â 450 (b)âA caregiver must: 451 1.âNot be a qualified physician and not be employed by or 452 have an economic interest in an MMTC a medical marijuana 453 treatment center or a marijuana testing laboratory. 454 2.âBe 21 years of age or older and a resident of this 455 state. 456 3.âAgree in writing to assist with the qualified patientâs 457 medical use of marijuana. 458 4.âBe registered in the medical marijuana use registry as a 459 caregiver for no more than one qualified patient, except as 460 provided in this paragraph. 461 5.âSuccessfully complete a caregiver certification course 462 developed and administered by the department or its designee, 463 which must be renewed biennially. The price of the course may 464 not exceed $100. 465 6.âPass a level 2 background screening pursuant to chapter 466 435 subsection (9), unless the patient is a close relative of 467 the caregiver. In addition to the disqualifying offenses 468 specified in s. 435.04(2) and (3), a person may not serve as a 469 caregiver if he or she has an arrest awaiting final disposition 470 for; has been found guilty of, regardless of adjudication; or 471 has entered a plea of nolo contendere or guilty to an offense 472 under chapter 837, chapter 895, or chapter 896 or a similar law 473 of another jurisdiction. 474 (8)âMEDICAL MARIJUANA TREATMENT CENTERS.â 475 (a)âThe department shall license medical marijuana 476 treatment centers to ensure reasonable statewide accessibility 477 and availability as necessary for qualified patients registered 478 in the medical marijuana use registry and who are issued a 479 physician certification under this section. 480 1.âAs soon as practicable, but no later than July 3, 2017, 481 the department shall license as a medical marijuana treatment 482 center any entity that holds an active, unrestricted license to 483 cultivate, process, transport, and dispense low-THC cannabis, 484 medical cannabis, and cannabis delivery devices, under former s. 485 381.986, Florida Statutes 2016, before July 1, 2017, and which 486 meets the requirements of this section. In addition to the 487 authority granted under this section, these entities are 488 authorized to dispense low-THC cannabis, medical cannabis, and 489 cannabis delivery devices ordered pursuant to former s. 381.986, 490 Florida Statutes 2016, which were entered into the compassionate 491 use registry before July 1, 2017, and are authorized to begin 492 dispensing marijuana under this section on July 3, 2017. The 493 department may grant variances from the representations made in 494 such an entityâs original application for approval under former 495 s. 381.986, Florida Statutes 2014, pursuant to paragraph (e). 496 2.âThe department shall license as medical marijuana 497 treatment centers 10 applicants that meet the requirements of 498 this section, under the following parameters: 499 a.âAs soon as practicable, but no later than August 1, 500 2017, the department shall license any applicant whose 501 application was reviewed, evaluated, and scored by the 502 department and which was denied a dispensing organization 503 license by the department under former s. 381.986, Florida 504 Statutes 2014; which had one or more administrative or judicial 505 challenges pending as of January 1, 2017, or had a final ranking 506 within one point of the highest final ranking in its region 507 under former s. 381.986, Florida Statutes 2014; which meets the 508 requirements of this section; and which provides documentation 509 to the department that it has the existing infrastructure and 510 technical and technological ability to begin cultivating 511 marijuana within 30 days after registration as a medical 512 marijuana treatment center. 513 b.âAs soon as practicable, the department shall license one 514 applicant that is a recognized class member of Pigford v. 515 Glickman, 185 F.R.D. 82 (D.D.C. 1999), or In Re Black Farmers 516 Litig., 856 F. Supp. 2d 1 (D.D.C. 2011). An applicant licensed 517 under this sub-subparagraph is exempt from the requirement of 518 subparagraph (b)2. An applicant that applies for licensure under 519 this sub-subparagraph, pays its initial application fee, is 520 determined by the department through the application process to 521 qualify as a recognized class member, and is not awarded a 522 license under this sub-subparagraph may transfer its initial 523 application fee to one subsequent opportunity to apply for 524 licensure under subparagraph 4. 525 c.âAs soon as practicable, but no later than October 3, 526 2017, the department shall license applicants that meet the 527 requirements of this section in sufficient numbers to result in 528 10 total licenses issued under this subparagraph, while 529 accounting for the number of licenses issued under sub 530 subparagraphs a. and b. 531 3.âFor up to two of the licenses issued under subparagraph 532 2., the department shall give preference to applicants that 533 demonstrate in their applications that they own one or more 534 facilities that are, or were, used for the canning, 535 concentrating, or otherwise processing of citrus fruit or citrus 536 molasses and will use or convert the facility or facilities for 537 the processing of marijuana. 538 4.âWithin 6 months after the registration of 100,000 active 539 qualified patients in the medical marijuana use registry, the 540 department shall license four additional medical marijuana 541 treatment centers that meet the requirements of this section. 542 Thereafter, the department shall license four medical marijuana 543 treatment centers within 6 months after the registration of each 544 additional 100,000 active qualified patients in the medical 545 marijuana use registry that meet the requirements of this 546 section. 547 (b)âAn applicant for licensure as a medical marijuana 548 treatment center must apply to the department on a form 549 prescribed by the department and adopted in rule. The department 550 shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 551 establishing a procedure for the issuance and biennial renewal 552 of licenses, including initial application and biennial renewal 553 fees sufficient to cover the costs of implementing and 554 administering this section, and establishing supplemental 555 licensure fees for payment beginning May 1, 2018, sufficient to 556 cover the costs of administering ss. 381.989 and 1004.4351. The 557 department shall identify applicants with strong diversity plans 558 reflecting this stateâs commitment to diversity and implement 559 training programs and other educational programs to enable 560 minority persons and minority business enterprises, as defined 561 in s. 288.703, and veteran business enterprises, as defined in 562 s. 295.187, to compete for medical marijuana treatment center 563 licensure and contracts. Subject to the requirements in 564 subparagraphs (a)2.-4., the department shall issue a license to 565 an applicant if the applicant meets the requirements of this 566 section and pays the initial application fee. The department 567 shall renew the licensure of a medical marijuana treatment 568 center biennially if the licensee meets the requirements of this 569 section and pays the biennial renewal fee. However, the 570 department may not renew the license of a medical marijuana 571 treatment center that has not begun to cultivate, process, and 572 dispense marijuana by the date that the medical marijuana 573 treatment center is required to renew its license. An individual 574 may not be an applicant, owner, officer, board member, or 575 manager on more than one application for licensure as a medical 576 marijuana treatment center. An individual or entity may not be 577 awarded more than one license as a medical marijuana treatment 578 center. An applicant for licensure as a medical marijuana 579 treatment center must demonstrate: 580 1.âThat, for the 5 consecutive years before submitting the 581 application, the applicant has been registered to do business in 582 this state. 583 2.âPossession of a valid certificate of registration issued 584 by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services pursuant 585 to s. 581.131. 586 3.âThe technical and technological ability to cultivate and 587 produce marijuana, including, but not limited to, low-THC 588 cannabis. 589 4.âThe ability to secure the premises, resources, and 590 personnel necessary to operate as a medical marijuana treatment 591 center. 592 5.âThe ability to maintain accountability of all raw 593 materials, finished products, and any byproducts to prevent 594 diversion or unlawful access to or possession of these 595 substances. 596 6.âAn infrastructure reasonably located to dispense 597 marijuana to registered qualified patients statewide or 598 regionally as determined by the department. 599 7.âThe financial ability to maintain operations for the 600 duration of the 2-year approval cycle, including the provision 601 of certified financial statements to the department. 602 a.âUpon approval, the applicant must post a $5 million 603 performance bond issued by an authorized surety insurance 604 company rated in one of the three highest rating categories by a 605 nationally recognized rating service. However, a medical 606 marijuana treatment center serving at least 1,000 qualified 607 patients is only required to maintain a $2 million performance 608 bond. 609 b.âIn lieu of the performance bond required under sub 610 subparagraph a., the applicant may provide an irrevocable letter 611 of credit payable to the department or provide cash to the 612 department. If provided with cash under this sub-subparagraph, 613 the department must deposit the cash in the Grants and Donations 614 Trust Fund within the Department of Health, subject to the same 615 conditions as the bond regarding requirements for the applicant 616 to forfeit ownership of the funds. If the funds deposited under 617 this sub-subparagraph generate interest, the amount of that 618 interest must be used by the department for the administration 619 of this section. 620 8.âThat all owners and managers have passed a background 621 screening pursuant to subsection (9). As used in this 622 subparagraph, the term: 623 a.ââManagerâ means any person with the authority to 624 exercise or contribute to the operational control, direction, or 625 management of an applicant or a medical marijuana treatment 626 center or who has authority to supervise any employee of an 627 applicant or a medical marijuana treatment center. The term 628 includes an individual with the power or authority to direct or 629 influence the direction or operation of an applicant or a 630 medical marijuana treatment center through board membership, an 631 agreement, or a contract. 632 b.ââOwnerâ means any person who owns or controls a 5 633 percent or greater share of interests of the applicant or a 634 medical marijuana treatment center which include beneficial or 635 voting rights to interests. In the event that one person owns a 636 beneficial right to interests and another person holds the 637 voting rights with respect to such interests, then in such case, 638 both are considered the owner of such interests. 639 9.âThe employment of a medical director to supervise the 640 activities of the medical marijuana treatment center. 641 10.âA diversity plan that promotes and ensures the 642 involvement of minority persons and minority business 643 enterprises, as defined in s. 288.703, or veteran business 644 enterprises, as defined in s. 295.187, in ownership, management, 645 and employment. An applicant for licensure renewal must show the 646 effectiveness of the diversity plan by including the following 647 with his or her application for renewal: 648 a.âRepresentation of minority persons and veterans in the 649 medical marijuana treatment centerâs workforce; 650 b.âEfforts to recruit minority persons and veterans for 651 employment; and 652 c.âA record of contracts for services with minority 653 business enterprises and veteran business enterprises. 654 (c)âA medical marijuana treatment center may not make a 655 wholesale purchase of marijuana from, or a distribution of 656 marijuana to, another medical marijuana treatment center, unless 657 the medical marijuana treatment center seeking to make a 658 wholesale purchase of marijuana submits proof of harvest failure 659 to the department. 660 (d)âDepartment responsibilities.âThe department shall do 661 all of the following: 662 1.âAdopt by rule all of the following: 663 a.âOperating standards for the cultivation, processing, 664 packaging, and labeling of marijuana. 665 b.âStandards for the sale of marijuana. 666 c.âProcedures and requirements for all of the following: 667 (I)âThe registration and registration renewal of MMTCs. 668 (II)âThe issuance and renewal of cultivation, processing, 669 retail, and transportation operating licenses. 670 (III)âThe issuance and renewal of cultivation, processing, 671 dispensing, and storage facility permits and vehicle permits. 672 (IV)âThe registration of all principals, employees, and 673 contractors of an MMTC who will participate in the operations of 674 the MMTC. 675 (V)âThe issuance of MMTC employee identification cards to 676 registered principals, employees, and contractors of MMTCs. 677 2.âEstablish, maintain, and control a computer software 678 tracking system that traces marijuana from seed to sale and 679 allows real-time, 24-hour access by the department to data from 680 all MMTCs medical marijuana treatment centers and marijuana 681 testing laboratories. The tracking system must allow for 682 integration of other seed-to-sale systems and, at a minimum, 683 include notification of when marijuana seeds are planted, when 684 marijuana plants are harvested and destroyed, and when marijuana 685 is transported, sold, stolen, diverted, or lost. Each MMTC 686 medical marijuana treatment center shall use the seed-to-sale 687 tracking system established by the department or integrate its 688 own seed-to-sale tracking system with the seed-to-sale tracking 689 system established by the department. Each MMTC medical 690 marijuana treatment center may use its own seed-to-sale system 691 until the department establishes a seed-to-sale tracking system. 692 The department may contract with a vendor to establish the seed 693 to-sale tracking system. The vendor selected by the department 694 may not have a contractual relationship with the department to 695 perform any services pursuant to this section other than the 696 seed-to-sale tracking system. The vendor may not have a direct 697 or indirect financial interest in an MMTC a medical marijuana 698 treatment center or a marijuana testing laboratory. 699 (b)âRegistration.â 700 1.âThe department shall adopt by rule an MMTC registration 701 form that, at a minimum, requires all of the following: 702 a.âThe applicantâs full legal name. 703 b.âThe physical address of each location where the 704 applicant will apply for a facility permit to cultivate, 705 process, dispense, or store marijuana. 706 c.âThe name, address, and date of birth of each of the 707 applicantâs principals. 708 d.âThe name, address, and date of birth of each of the 709 applicantâs current employees and contractors who will 710 participate in the operations of the MMTC. 711 e.âThe operation or operations in which the applicant 712 intends to engage, which may include one or more of the 713 following: 714 (I)âCultivation. 715 (II)âProcessing. 716 (III)âRetail sales. 717 (IV)âTransportation. 718 2.âTo be registered as an MMTC, an applicant must submit 719 all of the following to the department: 720 a.âThe applicantâs completed registration form. 721 b.âPersonnel registration forms, as described in subsection 722 (9), for all principals, employees, and contractors listed on 723 the applicantâs registration form who will participate in the 724 operations of the MMTC. The department may not register the 725 applicant as an MMTC until all principals, employees, and 726 contractors listed on the applicantâs registration form have 727 registered with the department and are issued MMTC employee 728 identification cards. 729 c.âProof that all principals listed on the applicantâs 730 registration form who will participate in the operations of the 731 MMTC have passed a level 2 background screening within the 732 previous year pursuant to chapter 435. 733 d.âProof that the MMTC has the capability to comply with 734 seed-to-sale tracking system requirements. 735 e.âProof of the applicantâs financial ability to maintain 736 operations for the duration of the registration. 737 f.âA $500,000 performance and compliance bond, or a $1 738 million performance and compliance bond if the MMTC intends to 739 cultivate or process marijuana, which will be forfeited if the 740 MMTC fails to comply with: 741 (I)âRegistration requirements in this paragraph during the 742 registration period; or 743 (II)âMaterial requirements of this section which are 744 applicable to the functions the applicant intends to perform, as 745 indicated on the registration form. 746 3.âA registration expires 2 years after the date it is 747 issued. 748 4.âIn addition to obtaining registration pursuant to this 749 paragraph, an MMTC must obtain an operating license for each 750 operation it will perform as provided in paragraph (c), 751 paragraph (d), or paragraph (f), as applicable. 752 (c)âCultivation licenses and processing licenses.â 753 1.âA registered MMTC may apply for a cultivation license or 754 a processing license. When applying, the MMTC must provide the 755 department with, at a minimum, all of the following: 756 a.âA completed cultivation license or processing license 757 application form. 758 b.âThe physical address of each location where marijuana 759 will be cultivated, processed, or stored. 760 c.âAs applicable to the requested license or licenses: 761 (I)âProof of an established infrastructure, or the ability 762 to establish an infrastructure in a reasonable amount of time, 763 that is designed for cultivation, processing, testing, 764 packaging, and labeling marijuana; proof of the ability to 765 maintain the infrastructureâs security; and proof of the ability 766 to prevent the theft or diversion of any marijuana. 767 (II)âProof that the applicant has the technical and 768 technological ability to cultivate and test or process and test 769 marijuana. 770 d.âProof of operating procedures designed to secure and 771 maintain accountability for all marijuana and marijuana-related 772 byproducts that come into the applicantâs possession and to 773 comply with the required seed-to-sale tracking system. 774 2.âCultivation licenses and processing licenses expire 2 775 years after the date they are issued. To renew a license, the 776 licensee must meet all of the requirements for initial 777 licensure; must provide all of the documentation required under 778 subparagraph 1.; and may not have any uncorrected substantial 779 violation of the standards adopted by department rule for the 780 cultivation, processing, testing, packaging, and labeling of 781 marijuana. 782 3.âBefore beginning cultivation or processing at any 783 location, the licensee must obtain a facility permit from the 784 department for that location pursuant to paragraph (g). 785 4.âA licensee under this subsection may use contractors to 786 assist with the cultivation or processing of marijuana, as 787 applicable, but the licensee is ultimately responsible for all 788 operations performed by each contractor relating to the 789 cultivation or processing of marijuana and is responsible for 790 maintaining physical possession of the marijuana at all times. 791 All work done by a contractor must be performed at a location 792 that has a facility permit issued by the department. A licensee 793 using a contractor must register any principal or employee of a 794 contractor who will be participating in the operations of the 795 licensee as provided in subsection (9). Such principal or 796 employee may not begin participating in the operations of the 797 licensee until he or she has received an MMTC employee 798 identification card from the department. 799 5.âAll marijuana byproducts that cannot be processed or 800 reprocessed must be destroyed by the cultivation licensee or the 801 processing licensee or their respective contractors within 30 802 days after the production of the byproducts. 803 6.âA licensee under this subsection may sell marijuana at 804 wholesale only to other registered MMTCs. Before selling 805 marijuana at wholesale, the selling MMTC shall provide the 806 purchasing MMTC with documentation showing that the marijuana 807 meets the testing, packaging, and labeling requirements of this 808 section. The purchasing MMTC shall review such documentation to 809 determine whether the marijuana is in compliance with this 810 section before taking possession of the marijuana. 811 7.âTransportation or delivery of marijuana outside of the 812 property owned by a licensee under this subsection may be 813 performed only by an MMTC that holds a transportation license 814 issued pursuant to paragraph (f) 815 (e)âA licensed medical marijuana treatment center shall 816 cultivate, process, transport, and dispense marijuana for 817 medical use. A licensed medical marijuana treatment center may 818 not contract for services directly related to the cultivation, 819 processing, and dispensing of marijuana or marijuana delivery 820 devices, except that a medical marijuana treatment center 821 licensed pursuant to subparagraph (a)1. may contract with a 822 single entity for the cultivation, processing, transporting, and 823 dispensing of marijuana and marijuana delivery devices. A 824 licensed medical marijuana treatment center shall, at all times, 825 maintain compliance with the criteria demonstrated and 826 representations made in the initial application and the criteria 827 established in this subsection. Upon request, the department may 828 grant a medical marijuana treatment center a variance from the 829 representations made in the initial application. Consideration 830 of such a request must be based upon the individual facts and 831 circumstances surrounding the request. A variance may not be 832 granted unless the requesting medical marijuana treatment center 833 can demonstrate to the department that it has a proposed 834 alternative to the specific representation made in its 835 application which fulfills the same or a similar purpose as the 836 specific representation in a way that the department can 837 reasonably determine will not be a lower standard than the 838 specific representation in the application. A variance may not 839 be granted from the requirements in subparagraph 2. and 840 subparagraphs (b)1. and 2. 841 1.âA licensed medical marijuana treatment center may 842 transfer ownership to an individual or entity who meets the 843 requirements of this section. A publicly traded corporation or 844 publicly traded company that meets the requirements of this 845 section is not precluded from ownership of a medical marijuana 846 treatment center. To accommodate a change in ownership: 847 a.âThe licensed medical marijuana treatment center shall 848 notify the department in writing at least 60 days before the 849 anticipated date of the change of ownership. 850 b.âThe individual or entity applying for initial licensure 851 due to a change of ownership must submit an application that 852 must be received by the department at least 60 days before the 853 date of change of ownership. 854 c.âUpon receipt of an application for a license, the 855 department shall examine the application and, within 30 days 856 after receipt, notify the applicant in writing of any apparent 857 errors or omissions and request any additional information 858 required. 859 d.âRequested information omitted from an application for 860 licensure must be filed with the department within 21 days after 861 the departmentâs request for omitted information or the 862 application will be deemed incomplete and withdrawn from further 863 consideration and the fees forfeited. 864 e.âWithin 30 days after the receipt of a complete 865 application, the department shall approve or deny the 866 application. 867 2.âA medical marijuana treatment center, and any individual 868 or entity who directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds 869 with power to vote 5 percent or more of the voting shares of a 870 medical marijuana treatment center, may not acquire direct or 871 indirect ownership or control of any voting shares or other form 872 of ownership of any other medical marijuana treatment center. 873 3.âA medical marijuana treatment center may not enter into 874 any form of profit-sharing arrangement with the property owner 875 or lessor of any of its facilities where cultivation, 876 processing, storing, or dispensing of marijuana and marijuana 877 delivery devices occurs. 878 4.âAll employees of a medical marijuana treatment center 879 must be 21 years of age or older and have passed a background 880 screening pursuant to subsection (9). As used in this 881 subparagraph, the term âemployeeâ means any person employed by a 882 medical marijuana treatment center licensee in any capacity, 883 including those whose duties involve any aspect of the 884 cultivation, processing, transportation, or dispensing of 885 marijuana. This requirement applies to all employees, regardless 886 of the compensation received. 887 5.âEach medical marijuana treatment center must adopt and 888 enforce policies and procedures to ensure employees and 889 volunteers receive training on the legal requirements to 890 dispense marijuana to qualified patients. 891 8.6.âWhen growing marijuana, an MMTC licensed for 892 cultivation a medical marijuana treatment center: 893 a.âMay use pesticides determined by the department, after 894 consultation with the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 895 Services, to be safely applied to plants intended for human 896 consumption, but may not use pesticides designated as 897 restricted-use pesticides pursuant to s. 487.042. 898 b.âShall Must grow marijuana within an enclosed permitted 899 cultivation facility structure and in a room separate from any 900 other plant. 901 c.âShall Must inspect seeds and growing plants for plant 902 pests that endanger or threaten the horticultural and 903 agricultural interests of the state in accordance with chapter 904 581 and any rules adopted thereunder. 905 d.âShall Must perform fumigation or treatment of plants, or 906 remove and destroy infested or infected plants, in accordance 907 with chapter 581 and any rules adopted thereunder. 908 7.âEach medical marijuana treatment center must produce and 909 make available for purchase at least one low-THC cannabis 910 product. 911 9.8.âAn MMTC A medical marijuana treatment center that 912 produces edibles must hold a permit to operate as a food 913 establishment pursuant to chapter 500, the Florida Food Safety 914 Act, and must comply with all the requirements for food 915 establishments pursuant to chapter 500 and any rules adopted 916 thereunder. Edibles may not contain more than 200 milligrams of 917 tetrahydrocannabinol, and a single serving portion of an edible 918 may not exceed 10 milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol. Edibles 919 may not have a tetrahydrocannabinol potency variance greater 920 than 15 percent. Marijuana products, including edibles, may not 921 be attractive to children; be manufactured in the shape of 922 humans, cartoons, or animals; be manufactured in a form that 923 bears any reasonable resemblance to products available for 924 consumption as commercially available candy; or contain any 925 color additives. To discourage consumption of edibles by 926 children, the department shall determine by rule all any shapes, 927 forms, and ingredients allowed and prohibited for edibles. MMTCs 928 Medical marijuana treatment centers may not begin processing or 929 dispensing edibles until after the effective date of the rule. 930 The department shall also adopt sanitation rules providing the 931 standards and requirements for the storage, display, or 932 dispensing of edibles. 933 9.âWithin 12 months after licensure, a medical marijuana 934 treatment center must demonstrate to the department that all of 935 its processing facilities have passed a Food Safety Good 936 Manufacturing Practices, such as Global Food Safety Initiative 937 or equivalent, inspection by a nationally accredited certifying 938 body. A medical marijuana treatment center must immediately stop 939 processing at any facility which fails to pass this inspection 940 until it demonstrates to the department that such facility has 941 met this requirement. 942 10.âA medical marijuana treatment center that produces 943 prerolled marijuana cigarettes may not use wrapping paper made 944 with tobacco or hemp. 945 11.âWhen processing marijuana, an MMTC licensed for 946 processing shall a medical marijuana treatment center must: 947 a.âProcess the marijuana within an enclosed permitted 948 processing facility structure and in a room separate from other 949 plants or products. 950 b.âComply with department rules when processing marijuana 951 with hydrocarbon solvents or other solvents or gases exhibiting 952 potential toxicity to humans. The department shall determine by 953 rule the requirements for the medical marijuana treatment 954 centers to use of such solvents or gases by MMTCs exhibiting 955 potential toxicity to humans. 956 c.âComply with federal and state laws and regulations and 957 department rules for solid and liquid wastes. The department 958 shall determine by rule procedures for the storage, handling, 959 transportation, management, and disposal of solid and liquid 960 waste generated during marijuana production and processing. The 961 Department of Environmental Protection shall assist the 962 department in developing such rules. 963 d.âTest the processed marijuana using a medical marijuana 964 testing laboratory before it is sold or dispensed. Results must 965 be verified and signed by two MMTC medical marijuana treatment 966 center employees. Before selling, selling at wholesale, or 967 dispensing, the MMTC shall medical marijuana treatment center 968 must determine whether that the test results indicate that low 969 THC cannabis meets the definition of low-THC cannabis, the 970 concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol meets the potency 971 requirements of this section, the labeling of the concentration 972 of tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabidiol is accurate, and all 973 marijuana is safe for human consumption and free from 974 contaminants that are unsafe for human consumption. The 975 department shall determine by rule which contaminants must be 976 tested for and the maximum levels of each contaminant which are 977 safe for human consumption. The Department of Agriculture and 978 Consumer Services shall assist the department in developing the 979 testing requirements for contaminants that are unsafe for human 980 consumption in edibles. The department shall also determine by 981 rule the procedures for the treatment of marijuana that fails to 982 meet the testing requirements of this section, s. 381.988, or 983 department rule. The department may select samples of marijuana 984 from an MMTC a medical marijuana treatment center facility which 985 must shall be tested by the department to determine whether the 986 marijuana meets the potency requirements of this section and, is 987 safe for human consumption, and is accurately labeled with the 988 tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabidiol concentration or to verify 989 the result of marijuana testing conducted by a marijuana testing 990 laboratory. The department may also select samples of marijuana 991 delivery devices from an MMTC a medical marijuana treatment 992 center to determine whether the marijuana delivery device is 993 safe for use by qualified patients. An MMTC A medical marijuana 994 treatment center may not require payment from the department for 995 the sample. An MMTC shall A medical marijuana treatment center 996 must recall marijuana, including all marijuana and marijuana 997 products made from the same batch of marijuana, that fails to 998 meet the potency requirements of this section, that is unsafe 999 for human consumption, or for which the labeling of the 1000 tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabidiol concentration is 1001 inaccurate. The department shall adopt rules to establish 1002 marijuana potency variations of no greater than 15 percent using 1003 negotiated rulemaking pursuant to s. 120.54(2)(d) which accounts 1004 for, but is not limited to, time lapses between testing, testing 1005 methods, testing instruments, and types of marijuana sampled for 1006 testing. The department may not issue any recalls for product 1007 potency as it relates to product labeling before issuing a rule 1008 relating to potency variation standards. An MMTC shall A medical 1009 marijuana treatment center must also recall all marijuana 1010 delivery devices determined to be unsafe for use by qualified 1011 patients. An MMTC shall The medical marijuana treatment center 1012 must retain records of all testing and samples of each 1013 homogeneous batch of marijuana for at least 9 months. An MMTC 1014 shall The medical marijuana treatment center must contract with 1015 a marijuana testing laboratory to perform audits on the MMTCâs 1016 medical marijuana treatment centerâs standard operating 1017 procedures, testing records, and samples and provide the results 1018 to the department to confirm that the marijuana or low-THC 1019 cannabis meets the requirements of this section and that the 1020 marijuana or low-THC cannabis is safe for human consumption. An 1021 MMTC A medical marijuana treatment center shall reserve two 1022 processed samples from each batch and retain such samples for at 1023 least 9 months for the purpose of such audits. An MMTC A medical 1024 marijuana treatment center may use a laboratory that has not 1025 been certified by the department under s. 381.988 until such 1026 time as at least one laboratory holds the required 1027 certification, but in no event later than July 1, 2018. 1028 e.âPackage the marijuana in compliance with the United 1029 States Poison Prevention Packaging Act of 1970, 15 U.S.C. ss. 1030 1471 et seq. 1031 f.âPackage the marijuana in a receptacle that has a firmly 1032 affixed and legible label stating the following information: 1033 (I)âThat the marijuana or low-THC cannabis meets the 1034 requirements of sub-subparagraph d. 1035 (II)âThe name of the MMTC medical marijuana treatment 1036 center from which the marijuana originates. 1037 (III)âThe batch number and harvest number from which the 1038 marijuana originates and the date that the marijuana is sold or 1039 dispensed. 1040 (IV)âThe name of the physician who issued the physician 1041 certification. 1042 (V)âThe name of the patient. 1043 (VI)âThe product name, if applicable, and dosage form, 1044 including concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabidiol. 1045 The product name may not contain wording commonly associated 1046 with products that are attractive to children or which promote 1047 the recreational use of marijuana. 1048 (V)(VII)âThe recommended dose. 1049 (VI)(VIII)âA warning that it is illegal to transfer medical 1050 marijuana to a another person younger than 21 years of age. 1051 (VII)(IX)âA marijuana universal symbol developed by the 1052 department. 1053 11.12.âThe MMTC that packages the marijuana medical 1054 marijuana treatment center shall include in each package an a 1055 patient package insert with information on the specific product 1056 dispensed related to all of the following: 1057 a.âClinical pharmacology. 1058 b.âIndications and use. 1059 c.âDosage and administration. 1060 d.âDosage forms and strengths. 1061 e.âContraindications. 1062 f.âWarnings and precautions. 1063 g.âAdverse reactions. 1064 12.13.âIn addition to the packaging and labeling 1065 requirements specified in subparagraphs 10. and 11. and 12., 1066 marijuana in a form for smoking must be packaged in a sealed 1067 receptacle with a legible and prominent warning to keep the 1068 receptacle away from children and a warning that states that 1069 marijuana smoke contains carcinogens and may negatively affect 1070 health. Such receptacles for marijuana in a form for smoking 1071 must be plain, opaque, and white without depictions of the 1072 product or images other than the MMTCâs medical marijuana 1073 treatment centerâs department-approved logo and the marijuana 1074 universal symbol. 1075 13.14.âThe department shall adopt rules to regulate the 1076 types, appearance, and labeling of marijuana delivery devices 1077 dispensed from an MMTC a medical marijuana treatment center. The 1078 rules must require marijuana delivery devices to have an 1079 appearance consistent with medical use. 1080 14.15.âEach edible must be individually sealed in plain, 1081 opaque wrapping marked only with the marijuana universal symbol. 1082 Where practical, Each edible must be marked with the marijuana 1083 universal symbol. In addition to the packaging and labeling 1084 requirements in subparagraphs 10. and 11. and 12., edible 1085 receptacles must be plain, opaque, and white without depictions 1086 of the product or images other than the MMTCâs medical marijuana 1087 treatment centerâs department-approved logo and the marijuana 1088 universal symbol. The receptacle must also include a list of all 1089 the edibleâs ingredients, storage instructions, information on 1090 the estimated amount of time for the edible to take effect, an 1091 expiration date, a legible and prominent warning to keep the 1092 receptacle away from children and pets, and a warning that the 1093 edible has not been produced or inspected pursuant to federal 1094 food safety laws. 1095 (d)âRetail licenses.â 1096 1.âA registered MMTC may apply for a retail license. When 1097 applying, the MMTC must provide the department with, at a 1098 minimum, all of the following: 1099 a.âA completed retail license application form. 1100 b.âA statement by the applicant which indicates whether the 1101 applicant intends to dispense by delivery. A retail licensee may 1102 not deliver marijuana without also obtaining a transportation 1103 license pursuant to paragraph (f). 1104 c.âThe physical address of each location where the 1105 applicant will dispense or store marijuana. 1106 d.âIdentifying information for all other current or 1107 previous retail licenses held by the applicant or any of the 1108 applicantâs principals. 1109 e.âProof of operating procedures designed to secure and 1110 maintain accountability for all marijuana that the applicant 1111 receives and possesses, to ensure that only the allowed amount 1112 of marijuana is sold or dispensed, to ensure that the specified 1113 type of marijuana is correctly dispensed to a qualified patient 1114 or his or her caregiver pursuant to a physician certification, 1115 and to monitor the medical marijuana patient registry and 1116 electronically update the registry with dispensing information. 1117 2.âA retail license expires 2 years after the date it is 1118 issued. The retail licensee must apply for license renewal 1119 before the expiration date. To renew a license, a retail 1120 licensee must meet all of the requirements for initial 1121 licensure; must provide all of the documents required under 1122 paragraph (b); and must not have any outstanding substantial 1123 violations of the applicable standards adopted by department 1124 rule. 1125 3.âBefore beginning to sell, dispense, or store marijuana, 1126 the retail licensee must obtain a facility permit from the 1127 department for each location where marijuana will be sold, 1128 dispensed, or stored. If a facilityâs permit expires or is 1129 suspended or revoked, the MMTC must cease all applicable 1130 operations at that facility until the department inspects the 1131 facility and renews or reinstates the facilityâs permit. 1132 4.âA dispensing facility may not repackage or modify 1133 marijuana that has already been packaged for sale by a 1134 cultivation licensee or processing licensee unless the 1135 repackaging is of unprocessed marijuana, is done in accordance 1136 with instructions from the cultivator or processor, and is 1137 documented in the required seed-to-sale tracking system. 1138 5.âA retail licensee may contract with an MMTC that has a 1139 transportation license to transport marijuana between properties 1140 owned by the retail licensee, to deliver the marijuana for sale 1141 or dispensing, and to pick up returns of marijuana. 1142 6.âOnsite consumption or administration of marijuana at a 1143 dispensing facility is prohibited. 1144 7.16.âWhen dispensing marijuana or a marijuana delivery 1145 device, an MMTC licensed for retail a medical marijuana 1146 treatment center: 1147 a.âMay dispense any active, valid order for low-THC 1148 cannabis, medical cannabis and cannabis delivery devices issued 1149 pursuant to former s. 381.986, Florida Statutes 2016, which was 1150 entered into the medical marijuana use registry before July 1, 1151 2017. 1152 b.âMay not dispense more than one a 70-day supply of 1153 marijuana within any 70-day period to a qualified patient or 1154 caregiver and. may not dispense more than one 35-day supply of 1155 marijuana in a form for smoking within any 35-day period to a 1156 qualified patient or caregiver. A 35-day supply of marijuana in 1157 a form for smoking may not exceed 2.5 ounces unless an exception 1158 to this amount is approved by the department pursuant to 1159 paragraph (4)(f). 1160 c.âShall require Must have the MMTCâs medical marijuana 1161 treatment centerâs employee who dispenses the marijuana or a 1162 marijuana delivery device to enter into the medical marijuana 1163 use registry his or her name or unique employee identifier. 1164 d.âShall must verify before dispensing to a qualified 1165 patient or caregiver that the qualified patient and, if 1166 applicable, the caregiver, if applicable, each have an active 1167 registration in the medical marijuana use registry and an active 1168 and valid medical marijuana use registry identification card; 1169 that, the amount and type of marijuana dispensed matches the 1170 physician certification in the medical marijuana use registry 1171 for that qualified patient;, and that the physician 1172 certification has not already been filled. 1173 e.âShall, before dispensing to a qualified patient or 1174 caregiver, label the marijuana or the marijuana delivery device 1175 with the name of the physician who issued the physician 1176 certification and the name of the patient for whom the 1177 certification was issued. 1178 f.âMay not dispense marijuana to a qualified patient who is 1179 younger than 18 years of age. If the qualified patient is 1180 younger than 18 years of age, marijuana may only be dispensed 1181 only to the qualified patientâs caregiver. 1182 g.âMay sell marijuana to an adult 21 years of age or older 1183 pursuant to s. 381.9901, provided that the MMTC is registered 1184 with the Department of Business and Professional Regulation 1185 pursuant to that section. When selling marijuana pursuant to 1186 that section, the employee selling the marijuana must determine 1187 that the appearance of the buyer is such that a prudent person 1188 would believe the buyer to be 21 years of age or older or must 1189 carefully check the buyerâs driver license, identification card 1190 issued by this state or another state of the United States, 1191 passport, or United States Armed Services identification card to 1192 determine the buyerâs age. Other than for the purpose of 1193 determining a buyerâs age, an MMTC may not request or store any 1194 personal information provided by the buyer. 1195 h.f.âMay not dispense or sell any other type of cannabis, 1196 alcohol, or illicit drug-related product, including pipes or 1197 wrapping papers made with tobacco or hemp, other than a 1198 marijuana delivery device required for the medical use of 1199 marijuana and which is specified in a physician certification. 1200 i.g.âShall Must, upon dispensing the marijuana or marijuana 1201 delivery device to a qualified patient or caregiver, record in 1202 the registry the date, time, quantity, and form of marijuana 1203 dispensed; the type of marijuana delivery device dispensed; and 1204 the name and medical marijuana use registry identification 1205 number of the qualified patient or caregiver to whom the 1206 marijuana delivery device was dispensed. 1207 j.h.âShall Must ensure that patient records are not visible 1208 to anyone other than the qualified patient, his or her 1209 caregiver, and authorized MMTC medical marijuana treatment 1210 center employees. 1211 (e)(f)âSecurity.âTo ensure the safety and security of 1212 premises where the cultivation, processing, storing, or 1213 dispensing of marijuana occurs, and to maintain adequate 1214 controls against the diversion, theft, and loss of marijuana or 1215 marijuana delivery devices, an MMTC a medical marijuana 1216 treatment center shall do all of the following: 1217 1.a.âMaintain a fully operational security alarm system 1218 that secures all entry points and perimeter windows and is 1219 equipped with motion detectors; pressure switches; and duress, 1220 panic, and hold-up alarms.; and 1221 b.âMaintain a video surveillance system that records 1222 continuously, 24 hours a day, and meets all of the following 1223 criteria: 1224 (I)âCameras are fixed in a place that allows for the clear 1225 identification of persons and activities in controlled areas of 1226 the premises. Controlled areas include grow rooms, processing 1227 rooms, storage rooms, disposal rooms or areas, and point-of-sale 1228 rooms. 1229 (II)âCameras are fixed in entrances and exits to the 1230 premises in a place that allows recording, which must record 1231 from both indoor and outdoor, or ingress and egress, vantage 1232 points. 1233 (III)âImages are recorded images must clearly and 1234 accurately display the time and date of recording. 1235 c.(IV)âRetain video surveillance recordings for at least 45 1236 days or longer upon the request of a law enforcement agency. 1237 2.âEnsure that the MMTCâs medical marijuana treatment 1238 centerâs outdoor premises have sufficient lighting from dusk 1239 until dawn. 1240 3.âEnsure that the indoor premises where dispensing occurs 1241 include includes a waiting area with sufficient space and 1242 seating to accommodate qualified patients and caregivers and at 1243 least one private consultation area that is isolated from both 1244 the waiting area and the area where dispensing occurs. An MMTC A 1245 medical marijuana treatment center may not display products or 1246 dispense marijuana or marijuana delivery devices in the waiting 1247 area. 1248 4.âCease dispensing Not dispense from its premises 1249 marijuana or a marijuana delivery devices from its premises 1250 device between the hours of 11 p.m. 9 p.m. and 7 a.m., but may 1251 perform all other operations and deliver marijuana to qualified 1252 patients 24 hours a day. 1253 5.âStore marijuana in a secured, locked room or a vault. 1254 6.âRequire at least two of its employees, or two employees 1255 of a security agency with whom it contracts, to be on the 1256 premises at all times where cultivation, processing, or storing 1257 of marijuana occurs, at all times. 1258 7.âRequire each employee or contractor to wear a photo 1259 identification badge at all times while on the premises. 1260 8.âRequire each visitor to wear a visitor pass at all times 1261 while on the premises. 1262 9.âImplement an alcohol and drug-free workplace policy. 1263 10.âReport to a local law enforcement agency and notify the 1264 department through e-mail within 24 hours after the MMTC medical 1265 marijuana treatment center is notified or becomes aware of any 1266 actual or attempted theft, diversion, or loss of marijuana. 1267 (f)âTransportation licenses; vehicle permits.â 1268 1.âA registered MMTC may apply for a transportation 1269 license. When applying, the MMTC must provide the department 1270 with, at a minimum, all of the following: 1271 a.âThe physical address of the MMTCâs place of business. 1272 b.âProof that the MMTC has a documentation system in 1273 accordance with the required seed-to-sale tracking system, 1274 including transportation manifests, for transporting marijuana 1275 between licensed facilities and to qualified patients. 1276 Transportation manifests may be electronically stored and 1277 presented. 1278 c.âProof of the MMTCâs compliance with health and 1279 sanitation standards for the transportation of marijuana. 1280 d.âProof that all marijuana transported between licensed 1281 facilities will be transported in tamper-evident shipping 1282 containers. 1283 2.âAn MMTC with a transportation license may not transport 1284 marijuana on the property of an airport, a seaport, a spaceport, 1285 or any property of the Federal Government. 1286 3.âAn MMTC with a transportation license may transport 1287 marijuana and marijuana delivery devices only in a vehicle that 1288 is owned or leased by the MMTC or the MMTCâs contractor and for 1289 which a valid vehicle permit has been issued by the department. 1290 4.Â An MMTC with a transportation license may obtain a 1291 vehicle permit upon submission of an application. The MMTC shall 1292 designate as the driver for each permitted vehicle an employee 1293 or contracted employee who is registered with the department and 1294 who is authorized to possess marijuana when not on the property 1295 of the MMTC. Such designation must be displayed in the vehicle 1296 at all times. Each permitted vehicle must be monitored using GPS 1297 technology. A vehicle permit remains valid and does not expire 1298 unless the MMTC or its contractor disposes of the permitted 1299 vehicle or the MMTCâs registration or transportation license is 1300 transferred, canceled, not renewed, or revoked by the 1301 department. The department shall cancel a vehicle permit upon 1302 the request of the MMTC or its contractor. 1303 5.Â When transporting marijuana, a permitted vehicle is 1304 subject to inspection and search without a search warrant by 1305 authorized employees of the department, sheriffs, deputy 1306 sheriffs, police officers, or other law enforcement officers to 1307 determine whether the MMTC is operating in compliance with this 1308 section. 1309 6.âAn MMTC with a transportation license may deliver, or 1310 contract for the delivery of, marijuana and marijuana delivery 1311 devices to other MMTCs within this state, to qualified patients 1312 and caregivers within this state, and to adults 21 years of age 1313 or older within this state. A county or municipality may not 1314 prohibit deliveries of marijuana or marijuana delivery devices 1315 to qualified patients or caregivers within that county or 1316 municipality. Deliveries may be made only to the qualified 1317 patient who placed the order or his or her caregiver. When 1318 delivering to a qualified patient or caregiver, an MMTC or its 1319 contractor shall verify the identity of the qualified patient 1320 upon placement of the delivery order and, again, upon delivery. 1321 When delivering marijuana to an adult 21 years of age or older, 1322 an MMTC or its contractor shall verify the age of the buyer upon 1323 placement of the order and again upon delivery. In order to 1324 verify the age of the buyer, the MMTC must determine that the 1325 appearance of the buyer is such that a prudent person would 1326 believe the buyer to be 21 years of age or older or must 1327 carefully check the buyerâs driver license, identification card 1328 issued by this state or another state of the United States, 1329 passport, or United States Armed Services identification card to 1330 determine the buyerâs age. The department shall adopt rules 1331 specific to the delivery of marijuana which include both of the 1332 following: 1333 a.âProcedures for verifying the age and identity of the 1334 person placing an order and receiving a delivery, as 1335 appropriate, including required training for delivery personnel. 1336 b.âA maximum dispensary value for all marijuana and 1337 currency that may be in the possession of a registered MMTC 1338 employee or contractor while he or she makes a delivery. The 1339 maximum value established by rule may not be less than $5,000. 1340 7.âLicensees under this subsection may use contractors to 1341 assist with the transportation of marijuana. A licensee is 1342 ultimately responsible for all actions and operations of each 1343 contractor relating to the transportation of marijuana and must 1344 know the location of all marijuana products at all times. To 1345 participate in the operations of a licensee under this 1346 subsection, a principal or an employee of a contractor 1347 contracted by the licensee must first register with the 1348 department under subsection (9) and be issued an MMTC employee 1349 identification card. 1350 (g)âFacility permits.â 1351 1.âBefore cultivating, processing, dispensing, or storing 1352 marijuana at any location, an MMTC shall apply to the department 1353 for the applicable facility permit for that location. The 1354 department shall adopt by rule an application form. Upon 1355 receiving a request for a permit from a licensee, the department 1356 shall inspect the facility for compliance with this section and 1357 rules adopted hereunder and, upon a determination of compliance, 1358 shall issue a permit to the facility. The department shall issue 1359 or deny a facility permit within 30 days after receiving the 1360 request for the permit. 1361 2.âA facility permit expires 2 years after the date it is 1362 issued. Each facility must be inspected by the department for 1363 compliance with this section and department rules before the 1364 facilityâs permit is renewed. 1365 3.âIf a facility permit expires or is suspended or revoked, 1366 the MMTC must cease all applicable operations at that facility 1367 until the department inspects the facility and renews or 1368 reinstates the facilityâs permit. 1369 4.âCultivation facilities and processing facilities: 1370 a.âShall maintain insurance with at least $1 million of 1371 hazard and liability insurance per location; and 1372 b.âMust be secure, closed to the public, and, unless an 1373 ordinance allows a facility to be located closer, located at 1374 least 1,000 feet away from any existing public or private 1375 elementary or secondary school, child care facility as defined 1376 in s. 402.302, or licensed service provider offering substance 1377 abuse services. 1378 5.âAll matters regarding the permitting and regulation of 1379 cultivation facilities and processing facilities, including the 1380 location of such facilities, are preempted to the state. 1381 6.âDispensing facilities and storage facilities: 1382 a.âShall maintain insurance with at least $500,000 of 1383 hazard and liability insurance for each facility where marijuana 1384 is dispensed or stored; and 1385 b.âUnless an ordinance allows a facility to be located 1386 closer, must be located at least 1,000 feet away from any 1387 existing public or private elementary or secondary school, child 1388 care facility as defined in s. 402.302, or licensed service 1389 provider offering substance abuse services. 1390 7.âThe governing body of a county or municipality, by 1391 ordinance, may prohibit or limit the number of dispensing 1392 facilities located within its jurisdiction but may not prohibit 1393 an MMTC with a retail license or its permitted storage facility 1394 from being located within its jurisdiction if the licensee is 1395 delivering or contracting to deliver marijuana to qualified 1396 patients within that jurisdiction. The department may not issue 1397 a facility permit for a dispensing facility in a county or 1398 municipality in which the board of county commissioners or other 1399 local governing body, as applicable, has adopted such an 1400 ordinance. A county or municipality may not require, request, or 1401 accept financial contributions or similar benefits from MMTCs; 1402 however, in addition to other taxes authorized by law, a county 1403 or municipality may levy a local business tax on a dispensing 1404 facility. An ordinance adopted by a municipality or county 1405 pursuant to this paragraph may not do any of the following: 1406 a.âProvide exclusive access to one or several individuals 1407 or entities to operate dispensing facilities within the 1408 jurisdiction. 1409 b.âProhibit specific individuals or entities from operating 1410 a dispensing facility within the jurisdiction if the ordinance 1411 allows dispensing facilities to operate in the jurisdiction. 1412 c.âProhibit the delivery of marijuana within the 1413 jurisdiction by a properly licensed MMTC located within the 1414 jurisdiction. 1415 8.âThe department may adopt by rule additional requirements 1416 for the permitting of cultivation, processing, dispensing, and 1417 storage facilities to ensure the sanitary, safe, and secure 1418 cultivation, processing, dispensing, storage, and sale of 1419 marijuana To ensure the safe transport of marijuana and 1420 marijuana delivery devices to medical marijuana treatment 1421 centers, marijuana testing laboratories, or qualified patients, 1422 a medical marijuana treatment center must: 1423 1.âMaintain a marijuana transportation manifest in any 1424 vehicle transporting marijuana. The marijuana transportation 1425 manifest must be generated from a medical marijuana treatment 1426 centerâs seed-to-sale tracking system and include the: 1427 a.âDeparture date and approximate time of departure. 1428 b.âName, location address, and license number of the 1429 originating medical marijuana treatment center. 1430 c.âName and address of the recipient of the delivery. 1431 d.âQuantity and form of any marijuana or marijuana delivery 1432 device being transported. 1433 e.âArrival date and estimated time of arrival. 1434 f.âDelivery vehicle make and model and license plate 1435 number. 1436 g.âName and signature of the medical marijuana treatment 1437 center employees delivering the product. 1438 (I)âA copy of the marijuana transportation manifest must be 1439 provided to each individual, medical marijuana treatment center, 1440 or marijuana testing laboratory that receives a delivery. The 1441 individual, or a representative of the center or laboratory, 1442 must sign a copy of the marijuana transportation manifest 1443 acknowledging receipt. 1444 (II)âAn individual transporting marijuana or a marijuana 1445 delivery device must present a copy of the relevant marijuana 1446 transportation manifest and his or her employee identification 1447 card to a law enforcement officer upon request. 1448 (III)âMedical marijuana treatment centers and marijuana 1449 testing laboratories must retain copies of all marijuana 1450 transportation manifests for at least 3 years. 1451 2.âEnsure only vehicles in good working order are used to 1452 transport marijuana. 1453 3.âLock marijuana and marijuana delivery devices in a 1454 separate compartment or container within the vehicle. 1455 4.âRequire employees to have possession of their employee 1456 identification card at all times when transporting marijuana or 1457 marijuana delivery devices. 1458 5.âRequire at least two persons to be in a vehicle 1459 transporting marijuana or marijuana delivery devices, and 1460 require at least one person to remain in the vehicle while the 1461 marijuana or marijuana delivery device is being delivered. 1462 6.âProvide specific safety and security training to 1463 employees transporting or delivering marijuana and marijuana 1464 delivery devices. 1465 (h)âAdvertising.âAn MMTC A medical marijuana treatment 1466 center may not engage in advertising that is visible to members 1467 of the public from any street, sidewalk, park, or other public 1468 place, except: 1469 1.âAn MMTC dispensing facility The dispensing location of A 1470 medical marijuana treatment center may have a sign that is 1471 affixed to the outside or hanging in the window of the premises 1472 which identifies the dispensing facility dispensary by the 1473 licenseeâs business name, a department-approved trade name, or a 1474 department-approved logo. An MMTCâs A medical marijuana 1475 treatment centerâs trade name and logo may not contain wording 1476 or images that are attractive to children or which promote 1477 recreational use of marijuana. 1478 2.âAn MMTC A medical marijuana treatment center may engage 1479 in Internet advertising and marketing under the following 1480 conditions: 1481 a.âAll advertisements must be approved by the department. 1482 b.âAn advertisement may not have any content that is 1483 attractive to children or which promotes the recreational use of 1484 marijuana. 1485 c.âAn advertisement may not be an unsolicited pop-up 1486 advertisement. 1487 d.âOpt-in marketing must include an easy and permanent opt 1488 out feature. 1489 (i)âOnline retail catalogs.âEach retail MMTC medical 1490 marijuana treatment center that dispenses marijuana and 1491 marijuana delivery devices shall make all of the following 1492 available to the public on its website: 1493 1.âEach marijuana and low-THC product available for 1494 purchase, including the form, strain of marijuana from which it 1495 was extracted, cannabidiol content, tetrahydrocannabinol 1496 content, dose unit, total number of doses available, and the 1497 ratio of cannabidiol to tetrahydrocannabinol for each product. 1498 2.âThe price for a 30-day, 50-day, and 70-day supply at a 1499 standard dose for each marijuana and low-THC product available 1500 for purchase. 1501 3.âThe price for each marijuana delivery device available 1502 for purchase. 1503 4.âIf applicable, any discount policies and eligibility 1504 criteria for such discounts. 1505 (j)âSourcing of marijuana for medical use.âMMTCs Medical 1506 marijuana treatment centers are the sole source from which a 1507 person qualified patient may legally obtain marijuana. 1508 (k)âRulemaking.âThe department may adopt rules pursuant to 1509 ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this subsection. 1510 (9)âMEDICAL MARIJUANA TREATMENT CENTER PERSONNEL; 1511 REGISTRATION; EMPLOYEE IDENTIFICATION CARDS.â 1512 (a)âThe department shall adopt rules to administer the 1513 registration of MMTC principals, employees, and contractors who 1514 participate in the operations of an MMTC. Before hiring or 1515 contracting with any individual who is not registered with the 1516 department or who does not possess a current MMTC employee 1517 identification card, an MMTC must apply to the department to 1518 register that person as an MMTC employee. The department shall 1519 adopt by rule a form for such applications for registration, 1520 which must require the applicant to provide all of the 1521 following: 1522 1.âHis or her full legal name, social security number, date 1523 of birth, and home address. 1524 2.âA full-face, passport-type, color photograph of the 1525 applicant taken within 90 days immediately preceding submission 1526 of the application. 1527 3.âProof that he or she has passed a level 2 background 1528 screening pursuant to chapter 435 within the previous year. 1529 4.âAn indication as to whether the applicant will be 1530 authorized by the MMTC to possess marijuana while not on MMTC 1531 property. 1532 (b)âOnce the department has received a completed 1533 application form from an MMTC, the department shall register the 1534 principal, employee, or contractor associated with the MMTC and 1535 issue him or her an MMTC employee identification card that, at a 1536 minimum, includes all of the following: 1537 1.âThe employeeâs name and the name of the MMTC that 1538 employs him or her. 1539 2.âThe employeeâs photograph, as required under paragraph 1540 (a). 1541 3.âThe expiration date of the card, which must be 1 year 1542 after the date it is issued. 1543 4.âAn indication of whether the employee is authorized by 1544 the MMTC to possess marijuana while not on MMTC property. 1545 (c)âIf any information provided to the department for the 1546 registration of an MMTC principal, employee, or contractor or in 1547 the application for an MMTC employee identification card 1548 changes, or if the registered personâs employment status with 1549 the MMTC changes, the registered person and the MMTC must 1550 provide the department with the new information or status within 1551 7 days after the change. 1552 (d)âThe department may contract with one or more vendors 1553 for the purpose of issuing MMTC employee identification cards 1554 under this subsection BACKGROUND SCREENING.âAn individual 1555 required to undergo a background screening pursuant to this 1556 section must pass a level 2 background screening as provided 1557 under chapter 435, which, in addition to the disqualifying 1558 offenses provided in s. 435.04, shall exclude an individual who 1559 has an arrest awaiting final disposition for, has been found 1560 guilty of, regardless of adjudication, or has entered a plea of 1561 nolo contendere or guilty to an offense under chapter 837, 1562 chapter 895, or chapter 896 or similar law of another 1563 jurisdiction. Exemptions from disqualification as provided under 1564 s. 435.07 do not apply to this subsection. 1565 (a)âSuch individual must submit a full set of fingerprints 1566 to the department or to a vendor, entity, or agency authorized 1567 by s. 943.053(13). The department, vendor, entity, or agency 1568 shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Law 1569 Enforcement for state processing, and the Department of Law 1570 Enforcement shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau 1571 of Investigation for national processing. 1572 (b)âFees for state and federal fingerprint processing and 1573 retention shall be borne by the medical marijuana treatment 1574 center or caregiver, as applicable. The state cost for 1575 fingerprint processing shall be as provided in s. 943.053(3)(e) 1576 for records provided to persons or entities other than those 1577 specified as exceptions therein. 1578 (c)âFingerprints submitted to the Department of Law 1579 Enforcement pursuant to this subsection shall be retained by the 1580 Department of Law Enforcement as provided in s. 943.05(2)(g) and 1581 (h) and, when the Department of Law Enforcement begins 1582 participation in the program, enrolled in the Federal Bureau of 1583 Investigationâs national retained print arrest notification 1584 program. Any arrest record identified shall be reported to the 1585 department. 1586 (10)âMEDICAL MARIJUANA TREATMENT CENTER INSPECTIONS; 1587 ADMINISTRATIVE ACTIONS.â 1588 (a)âThe department shall conduct announced or unannounced 1589 inspections of medical marijuana treatment centers to determine 1590 compliance with this section or rules adopted pursuant to this 1591 section. 1592 (b)âThe department shall inspect a medical marijuana 1593 treatment center Upon receiving a complaint or notice that an 1594 MMTC the medical marijuana treatment center has dispensed 1595 marijuana containing mold, bacteria, or any other contaminant 1596 that may cause or has caused an adverse effect to human health 1597 or the environment, the department shall inspect the MMTC, its 1598 facilities, and, as appropriate, any cultivation or processing 1599 facility of the MMTC from which the batch of marijuana was 1600 purchased. 1601 (b)(c)âThe department shall conduct at least a biennial 1602 inspection of each MMTC medical marijuana treatment center to 1603 evaluate its the medical marijuana treatment centerâs records, 1604 personnel, equipment, processes, security measures, sanitation 1605 practices, and quality assurance practices. 1606 (c)âThe department shall conduct at least a biennial 1607 inspection of each permitted facility. The department may 1608 conduct additional announced or unannounced inspections of a 1609 permitted facility within reasonable hours in order to ensure 1610 compliance with this section and rules adopted hereunder. 1611 (d)âThe Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services and 1612 the department shall enter into an interagency agreement to 1613 ensure cooperation and coordination in the performance of their 1614 obligations under this section and their respective regulatory 1615 and authorizing laws. The department, the Department of Highway 1616 Safety and Motor Vehicles, and the Department of Law Enforcement 1617 may enter into interagency agreements for the purposes specified 1618 in this subsection or subsection (7). 1619 (e)âThe department shall publish a list of all approved 1620 MMTCs medical marijuana treatment centers, medical directors, 1621 and qualified physicians on its website. 1622 (f)âThe department may impose administrative penalties, 1623 including reasonable fines not to exceed $10,000, on an MMTC a 1624 medical marijuana treatment center for any of the following 1625 violations: 1626 1.âViolating this section or department rule. 1627 2.âFailing to maintain qualifications for approval. 1628 3.âEndangering the health, safety, or security of a 1629 qualified patient or an adult purchasing marijuana pursuant to 1630 s. 381.9901. 1631 4.âImproperly disclosing personal and confidential 1632 information of the qualified patient. 1633 5.âAttempting to procure MMTC medical marijuana treatment 1634 center approval by bribery, fraudulent misrepresentation, or 1635 extortion. 1636 6.âBeing convicted or found guilty of, or entering a plea 1637 of guilty or nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a 1638 crime in any jurisdiction which directly relates to the business 1639 of an MMTC a medical marijuana treatment center. 1640 7.âMaking or filing a report or record that the MMTC 1641 medical marijuana treatment center knows to be false. 1642 8.âWillfully failing to maintain a record required by this 1643 section or department rule. 1644 9.âWillfully impeding or obstructing an employee or agent 1645 of the department in the furtherance of his or her official 1646 duties. 1647 10.âEngaging in fraud or deceit, negligence, incompetence, 1648 or misconduct in the business practices of an MMTC a medical 1649 marijuana treatment center. 1650 11.âMaking misleading, deceptive, or fraudulent 1651 representations in or related to the business practices of an 1652 MMTC a medical marijuana treatment center. 1653 12.âHaving a license or the authority to engage in any 1654 regulated profession, occupation, or business that is related to 1655 the business practices of an MMTC a medical marijuana treatment 1656 center suspended, revoked, or otherwise acted against by the 1657 licensing authority of any jurisdiction, including its agencies 1658 or subdivisions, for a violation that would constitute a 1659 violation under Florida law. 1660 13.âViolating a lawful order of the department or an agency 1661 of the state, or failing to comply with a lawfully issued 1662 subpoena of the department or an agency of the state. 1663 14.âFailing to determine adequately the age of a buyer who 1664 is not a qualified patient or caregiver. 1665 (g)âThe department may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew 1666 an MMTCâs registration, operating licenses, and any vehicle 1667 permits or facility permits a medical marijuana treatment center 1668 license if the MMTC medical marijuana treatment center commits 1669 any of the violations specified in paragraph (f). 1670 (h)âThe department shall refuse to renew the cultivation, 1671 processing, retail, or transportation license of an MMTC that 1672 has not begun to cultivate, process, dispense, or transport 1673 marijuana, as applicable, by the date that the MMTC is required 1674 to renew such license. 1675 (i)(h)âThe department may adopt rules pursuant to ss. 1676 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this subsection. 1677 (11)âPREEMPTION.âRegulation of cultivation, processing, and 1678 delivery of marijuana by MMTCs medical marijuana treatment 1679 centers is preempted to the state except as provided in this 1680 subsection. 1681 (a)âAn MMTC A medical marijuana treatment center 1682 cultivating or processing facility may not be located within 500 1683 feet of the real property that comprises a public or private 1684 elementary school, middle school, or secondary school. 1685 (b)1.âA county or municipality may, by ordinance, ban MMTC 1686 medical marijuana treatment center dispensing facilities from 1687 being located within the boundaries of that county or 1688 municipality. A county or municipality that does not ban 1689 dispensing facilities under this subparagraph may not place 1690 specific limits, by ordinance, on the number of dispensing 1691 facilities that may locate within that county or municipality. 1692 2.âA municipality may determine by ordinance the criteria 1693 for the location of, and other permitting requirements that do 1694 not conflict with state law or department rule for, MMTC medical 1695 marijuana treatment center dispensing facilities located within 1696 the boundaries of that municipality. A county may determine by 1697 ordinance the criteria for the location of, and other permitting 1698 requirements that do not conflict with state law or department 1699 rule for, all such dispensing facilities located within the 1700 unincorporated areas of that county. Except as provided in 1701 paragraph (c), a county or municipality may not enact ordinances 1702 for permitting or for determining the location of dispensing 1703 facilities which are more restrictive than its ordinances 1704 permitting or determining the locations for pharmacies licensed 1705 under chapter 465. A municipality or county may not charge an 1706 MMTC a medical marijuana treatment center a license or permit 1707 fee in an amount greater than the fee charged by such 1708 municipality or county to pharmacies. A dispensing facility 1709 location approved by a municipality or county pursuant to former 1710 s. 381.986(8)(b), Florida Statutes 2016, is not subject to the 1711 location requirements of this subsection. 1712 (c)âAn MMTC A medical marijuana treatment center dispensing 1713 facility may not be located within 500 feet of the real property 1714 that comprises a public or private elementary school, middle 1715 school, or secondary school unless the county or municipality 1716 approves the location through a formal proceeding open to the 1717 public at which the county or municipality determines that the 1718 location promotes the public health, safety, and general welfare 1719 of the community. 1720 (d)âThis subsection does not prohibit any local 1721 jurisdiction from ensuring that MMTC medical marijuana treatment 1722 center facilities comply with the Florida Building Code, the 1723 Florida Fire Prevention Code, or any local amendments to the 1724 Florida Building Code or the Florida Fire Prevention Code. 1725 (12)âPENALTIES.â 1726 (a)âA qualified physician commits a misdemeanor of the 1727 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 1728 775.083, if he or she the qualified physician issues a physician 1729 certification for the medical use of marijuana for a patient 1730 without a reasonable belief that the patient is suffering from a 1731 qualifying medical condition. 1732 (b)âA person who fraudulently represents that he or she has 1733 a qualifying medical condition to a qualified physician for the 1734 purpose of being issued a physician certification commits a 1735 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 1736 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1737 (c)1.âA person qualified patient who uses marijuana, not 1738 including low-THC cannabis, or a caregiver who administers 1739 marijuana, not including low-THC cannabis, in plain view of or 1740 in a place open to the general public is subject to a civil fine 1741 not exceeding $100. 1742 2.âA person who uses marijuana, not including low-THC 1743 cannabis,; in a school bus, a moving vehicle, or an aircraft, or 1744 a boat; or on the grounds of a school except as provided in s. 1745 1006.062, commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable 1746 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1747 (d)âA person qualified patient or caregiver who cultivates 1748 marijuana or who purchases or acquires marijuana from any person 1749 or entity other than an MTMC a medical marijuana treatment 1750 center violates s. 893.13 and is subject to the penalties 1751 provided therein. 1752 (e)1.âA qualified patient or caregiver in possession of 1753 marijuana or a marijuana delivery device who fails or refuses to 1754 present his or her marijuana use registry identification card 1755 upon the request of a law enforcement officer commits a 1756 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 1757 775.082 or s. 775.083, unless it can be determined through the 1758 medical marijuana use registry that the person is authorized to 1759 be in possession of that marijuana or marijuana delivery device. 1760 2.âA person charged with a violation of this paragraph may 1761 not be convicted if, before or at the time of his or her court 1762 or hearing appearance, the person produces in court or to the 1763 clerk of the court in which the charge is pending a medical 1764 marijuana use registry identification card issued to him or her 1765 which is valid at the time of his or her arrest. The clerk of 1766 the court is authorized to dismiss such case at any time before 1767 the defendantâs appearance in court. The clerk of the court may 1768 assess a fee of $5 for dismissing the case under this paragraph. 1769 (f)âA caregiver who violates any of the applicable 1770 provisions of this section or applicable department rules, for 1771 the first offense, commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, 1772 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083 and, for a 1773 second or subsequent offense, commits a misdemeanor of the first 1774 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1775 (f)(g)âA qualified physician who issues a physician 1776 certification for marijuana or a marijuana delivery device and 1777 receives compensation from an MMTC a medical marijuana treatment 1778 center related to the issuance of a physician certification for 1779 marijuana or a marijuana delivery device is subject to 1780 disciplinary action under the applicable practice act and s. 1781 456.072(1)(n). 1782 (g)(h)âA person transporting marijuana or marijuana 1783 delivery devices on behalf of an MMTC a medical marijuana 1784 treatment center or a marijuana testing laboratory who fails or 1785 refuses to present a transportation manifest, whether in paper 1786 or electronic format, upon the request of a law enforcement 1787 officer commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable 1788 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 1789 (h)(i)âPersons and entities conducting activities 1790 authorized and governed by this section and s. 381.988 are 1791 subject to ss. 456.053, 456.054, and 817.505, as applicable. 1792 (i)(j)âA person or entity that cultivates, processes, 1793 distributes, sells, or dispenses marijuana, as defined in s. 1794 29(b)(4), Art. X of the State Constitution, and is not licensed 1795 as an MMTC a medical marijuana treatment center violates s. 1796 893.13 and is subject to the penalties provided therein. This 1797 paragraph does not apply to a transfer of marijuana products or 1798 marijuana which is authorized by this section, s. 381.9901, or 1799 s. 893.13. 1800 (j)(k)âA person who manufactures, distributes, sells, 1801 gives, or possesses with the intent to manufacture, distribute, 1802 sell, or give marijuana or a marijuana delivery device that he 1803 or she holds out to have originated from a licensed MMTC medical 1804 marijuana treatment center but that is counterfeit commits a 1805 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 1806 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. For the purposes of this 1807 paragraph, the term âcounterfeitâ means marijuana; a marijuana 1808 delivery device; or a marijuana or marijuana delivery device 1809 container, seal, or label which, without authorization, bears 1810 the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, 1811 or device, or any likeness thereof, of a licensed MMTC medical 1812 marijuana treatment center and which thereby falsely purports or 1813 is represented to be the product of, or to have been distributed 1814 by, that licensed MMTC medical marijuana treatment facility. 1815 (k)(l)âA Any person who possesses or manufactures a blank, 1816 forged, stolen, fictitious, fraudulent, counterfeit, or 1817 otherwise unlawfully issued medical marijuana use registry 1818 identification card commits a felony of the third degree, 1819 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1820 (14)âEXCEPTIONS TO OTHER LAWS.â 1821 (a)âNotwithstanding s. 893.13, s. 893.135, s. 893.147, or 1822 any other provision of law, but subject to the requirements of 1823 this section, a qualified patient and the qualified patientâs 1824 caregiver may purchase from an MMTC a medical marijuana 1825 treatment center for the patientâs medical use a marijuana 1826 delivery device and up to the amount of marijuana authorized in 1827 the physician certification, but may not possess more than a 70 1828 day supply of marijuana, or the greater of 4 ounces of marijuana 1829 in a form for smoking or an amount of marijuana in a form for 1830 smoking approved by the department pursuant to paragraph (4)(f), 1831 at any given time and all marijuana purchased must remain in its 1832 original packaging. 1833 (b)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), s. 893.13, s. 893.135, 1834 s. 893.147, or any other provision of law, a qualified patient 1835 and the qualified patientâs caregiver may purchase and possess a 1836 marijuana delivery device intended for the medical use of 1837 marijuana by smoking from a vendor other than an MMTC a medical 1838 marijuana treatment center. 1839 (c)âNotwithstanding s. 893.13, s. 893.135, s. 893.147, or 1840 any other provision of law, but subject to the requirements of 1841 this section, an approved MMTC medical marijuana treatment 1842 center and its owners, managers, and employees may manufacture, 1843 possess, sell, deliver, distribute, dispense, and lawfully 1844 dispose of marijuana or a marijuana delivery device as provided 1845 in this section, s. 381.988, s. 381.9901, and by department 1846 rule. For the purposes of this subsection, the terms 1847 âmanufacture,â âpossession,â âdeliver,â âdistribute,â and 1848 âdispenseâ have the same meanings as provided in s. 893.02. 1849 (f)âA licensed MMTC medical marijuana treatment center and 1850 its owners, managers, and employees are not subject to licensure 1851 or regulation under chapter 465 or chapter 499 for 1852 manufacturing, possessing, selling, delivering, distributing, 1853 dispensing, or lawfully disposing of marijuana or a marijuana 1854 delivery device, as provided in this section, in s. 381.988, and 1855 by department rule. 1856 (17)âRules adopted pursuant to this section before July 1, 1857 2026, are not subject to ss. 120.54(3)(b) and 120.541. This 1858 subsection expires July 1, 2026. 1859 Section 3.âSection 381.9901, Florida Statutes, is created 1860 to read: 1861 381.9901âAdult use of marijuana.â 1862 (1)âA person 21 years of age or older may purchase in a 1863 single transaction marijuana products containing up to 2,000 1864 milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol; up to 2.5 ounces of 1865 marijuana in a form for smoking; and one or more marijuana 1866 delivery devices, as defined in s. 381.986, provided that such 1867 marijuana products, marijuana in a form for smoking, and 1868 marijuana delivery devices are purchased from a medical 1869 marijuana treatment center (MMTC) that is licensed by the 1870 department pursuant to s. 381.986 for the retail sale of 1871 marijuana and registered with the Department of Business and 1872 Professional Regulation for the sale of marijuana for adult use. 1873 A violation of this subsection is punishable as provided in s. 1874 893.13. 1875 (2)âA person 21 years of age or older who purchases 1876 marijuana products, marijuana in a form for smoking, or 1877 marijuana delivery devices in accordance with subsection (1) may 1878 possess, use, transport, and transfer, without consideration, to 1879 another person 21 years of age or older such products or 1880 devices. However, a person may not at any time possess marijuana 1881 products that, in total, contain more than 2,000 milligrams of 1882 tetrahydrocannabinol or more than 4 ounces of marijuana in a 1883 form for smoking. A violation of this subsection is punishable 1884 as provided in s. 893.13. 1885 (3)âThis section does not limit the ability of a private 1886 property owner to restrict the smoking or vaping of marijuana on 1887 his or her private property; however, a landlord may not prevent 1888 his or her tenants from possessing or using marijuana by other 1889 means. 1890 (4)âThis section does not exempt a person from prosecution 1891 for a criminal offense related to impairment or intoxication 1892 resulting from the use of marijuana or relieve a person from any 1893 requirement under law to submit to a breath, blood, or urine 1894 test or any other test to detect the presence of a controlled 1895 substance. 1896 Section 4.âSubsections (5) through (8) are added to section 1897 604.71, Florida Statutes, to read: 1898 604.71âLocal regulation of vegetable gardens.â 1899 (5)âA qualified patient as defined in s. 381.986 who is at 1900 least 21 years of age may cultivate up to six flowering cannabis 1901 plants at his or her residence for personal consumption and 1902 noncommercial purposes. 1903 (6)âA qualified patient as defined in s. 381.986 who is at 1904 least 21 years of age may purchase medical marijuana seeds and 1905 clones from a licensed medical marijuana treatment center. 1906 (7)âA qualified patient as defined in s. 381.986 who 1907 cultivates cannabis shall ensure that the plants are secured in 1908 a manner to prevent access by unauthorized persons. The personal 1909 consumption of cannabis cultivated at a qualified patientâs 1910 residence is subject to the limitations on medical use or 1911 administration of marijuana as specified in s. 381.986(1)(k). 1912 (8)âThe sale of patient-cultivated cannabis plants and 1913 products and cultivation of cannabis by patients beyond the 1914 limits specified in this section is subject to the penalties 1915 outlined in chapter 893. 1916 Section 5.âThe Department of Agriculture and Consumer 1917 Services shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 1918 120.54, Florida Statutes, regulating the cultivation of 1919 marijuana by members of the public for their private use, 1920 including rules regulating the use of a cooperative model for 1921 cultivation. The department shall adopt the rules no later than 1922 October 1, 2026. This section takes effect upon this act 1923 becoming a law. 1924 Section 6.âSubsection (3) and paragraphs (a) and (b) of 1925 subsection (6) of section 893.13, Florida Statutes, are amended 1926 to read: 1927 893.13âProhibited acts; penalties.â 1928 (3)(a)âA person 21 years of age or older may, without 1929 consideration, deliver to another person 21 years of age or 1930 older: 1931 1.âMarijuana products that contain a total of 2,000 1932 milligrams or less of tetrahydrocannabinol; and 1933 2.âA quantity of 2.5 ounces or less of cannabis, as defined 1934 in this chapter. 1935 (b)âA person younger than 21 years of age who, without 1936 consideration, delivers to another person marijuana products 1937 that contain a total of 2,000 milligrams or less of 1938 tetrahydrocannabinol or a quantity of 2.5 ounces or less of 1939 cannabis, as defined in this chapter, commits a misdemeanor of 1940 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 1941 775.083, for a first conviction for a violation of this 1942 paragraph and commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, 1943 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083, for a second 1944 or subsequent conviction for a violation of this paragraph who 1945 delivers, without consideration, 20 grams or less of cannabis, 1946 as defined in this chapter, commits a misdemeanor of the first 1947 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. As 1948 used in this subsection, the term âcannabisâ does not include 1949 the resin extracted from the plants of the genus Cannabis or any 1950 compound manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation 1951 of such resin. 1952 (6)(a)âExcept as otherwise provided in this subsection, a 1953 person may not be in actual or constructive possession of a 1954 controlled substance unless such controlled substance was 1955 lawfully obtained from a practitioner or pursuant to a valid 1956 prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the 1957 course of his or her professional practice or to be in actual or 1958 constructive possession of a controlled substance except as 1959 otherwise authorized by this chapter. A person who violates this 1960 provision commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as 1961 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1962 (b)1.âA person 21 years of age or older may possess 1963 marijuana products that contain a total of 2,000 milligrams or 1964 less of tetrahydrocannabinol and may possess 4 ounces or less of 1965 cannabis, as defined in this chapter If the offense is the 1966 possession of 20 grams or less of cannabis, as defined in this 1967 chapter, the person commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, 1968 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. As used in 1969 this subsection, the term âcannabisâ does not include the resin 1970 extracted from the plants of the genus Cannabis, or any compound 1971 manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such 1972 resin. 1973 2.âA person under 21 years of age who possesses marijuana 1974 products that contain a total of 2,000 milligrams or less of 1975 tetrahydrocannabinol or who possesses 4 ounces or less of 1976 cannabis, as defined in this chapter, commits a misdemeanor of 1977 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 1978 775.083, for a first conviction for a violation of this 1979 paragraph and a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as 1980 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083, for a second or subsequent 1981 conviction for a violation of this paragraph. 1982 Section 7.âSection 893.1352, Florida Statutes, is created 1983 to read: 1984 893.1352âRetroactive application of s. 893.13.â 1985 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to apply amendments 1986 to s. 893.13 retroactively to certain persons who were convicted 1987 of possession of cannabis before January 1, 2027. 1988 (2)âAs used in this section, a reference to âformer s. 1989 893.13, Florida Statutes 2026,â is a reference to s. 893.13 as 1990 it existed at any time before January 1, 2027. 1991 (3)(a)âA person who was convicted of a violation of former 1992 s. 893.13, Florida Statutes 2026, for possessing 4 ounces or 1993 less of cannabis as defined in chapter 893, but was not 1994 sentenced under that section before January 1, 2027, must be 1995 sentenced in accordance with s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 1996 775.084 for the degree of offense provided in s. 893.13. 1997 (b)âA person who was convicted of a violation of former s. 1998 893.13, Florida Statutes 2026, for possessing 4 ounces or less 1999 of cannabis as defined in chapter 893, who was sentenced before 2000 January 1, 2027, to a term of imprisonment or probation pursuant 2001 to former s. 893.13, Florida Statutes 2026, and who is serving 2002 the term of imprisonment or probation on or after January 1, 2003 2027, must have an opportunity for a sentence review hearing. If 2004 the person requests a sentence review hearing, he or she must be 2005 resentenced in accordance with paragraph (c). 2006 (c)âResentencing under this section must occur in the 2007 following manner: 2008 1.âThe Department of Corrections shall notify the person 2009 described in paragraph (b) of his or her eligibility to request 2010 a sentence review hearing. 2011 2.âA person seeking sentence review under this section may 2012 submit an application to the court of original jurisdiction 2013 requesting that a sentence review hearing be held. The 2014 sentencing court retains original jurisdiction for the duration 2015 of the sentence for the purpose of this review. 2016 3.âA person who is eligible for a sentence review hearing 2017 under this section is entitled to representation by legal 2018 counsel. If the person is indigent and unable to employ counsel, 2019 the court must appoint counsel under s. 27.52. Determinations of 2020 indigence and costs of representation are as provided in ss. 2021 27.52 and 938.29, respectively. 2022 4.âUpon receipt of a request for a sentence review hearing, 2023 the court of original jurisdiction shall hold such hearing to 2024 determine whether the person meets the criteria for resentencing 2025 under this section. If the court determines by a preponderance 2026 of the evidence that the person is currently serving a sentence 2027 for a violation of former s. 893.13, Florida Statutes 2026, and 2028 that the violation was for possession of cannabis in the amount 2029 of 4 ounces or less, the court must resentence the person in 2030 accordance with this section. If the court determines that the 2031 person does not meet the criteria for resentencing under this 2032 section, the court must provide written findings as to why the 2033 person does not meet the criteria. 2034 5.âIf the court finds that the underlying facts of a 2035 conviction that is subject to resentencing are classified as a 2036 crime under s. 893.13, the person must be resentenced to a term 2037 that would not exceed the maximum sentence provided by that 2038 section. The person is entitled to receive credit for his or her 2039 time served. 2040 6.âIf the court finds that the underlying facts of a 2041 conviction that is subject to resentencing are not classified as 2042 a crime under s. 893.13, the person must be resentenced to time 2043 served and released from supervision as soon as reasonably 2044 possible. 2045 (4)âNotwithstanding any other law, a person who has been 2046 convicted of a crime under former s. 893.13, Florida Statutes 2047 2026, and whose offense would not be classified as a crime under 2048 s. 893.13, must have all fines, fees, and costs related to such 2049 conviction waived. 2050 Section 8.âPresent subsections (5), (6), and (7) of section 2051 893.147, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6), 2052 (7), and (8), respectively, a new subsection (5) is added to 2053 that section, and subsections (1), (2), and (4) of that section 2054 are amended, to read: 2055 893.147âUse, possession, manufacture, delivery, 2056 transportation, advertisement, or retail sale of drug 2057 paraphernalia, specified machines, and materials.â 2058 (1)âUSE OR POSSESSION OF DRUG PARAPHERNALIA.âExcept as 2059 provided in subsection (5), it is unlawful for any person to 2060 use, or to possess with intent to use, drug paraphernalia: 2061 (a)âTo plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, 2062 manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test, 2063 analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, or conceal a controlled 2064 substance in violation of this chapter; or 2065 (b)âTo inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into 2066 the human body a controlled substance in violation of this 2067 chapter. 2068 2069 Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a 2070 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 2071 775.082 or s. 775.083. 2072 (2)âMANUFACTURE OR DELIVERY OF DRUG PARAPHERNALIA.âExcept 2073 as provided in subsection (5), it is unlawful for any person to 2074 deliver, possess with intent to deliver, or manufacture with 2075 intent to deliver drug paraphernalia, knowing, or under 2076 circumstances where one reasonably should know, that it will be 2077 used: 2078 (a)âTo plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, 2079 manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test, 2080 analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, or conceal a controlled 2081 substance in violation of this act; or 2082 (b)âTo inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into 2083 the human body a controlled substance in violation of this act. 2084 2085 Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a felony of 2086 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 2087 775.083, or s. 775.084. 2088 (4)âTRANSPORTATION OF DRUG PARAPHERNALIA.âExcept as 2089 provided in subsection (5), it is unlawful to use, possess with 2090 the intent to use, or manufacture with the intent to use drug 2091 paraphernalia, knowing or under circumstances in which one 2092 reasonably should know that it will be used to transport: 2093 (a)âA controlled substance in violation of this chapter; or 2094 (b)âContraband as defined in s. 932.701(2)(a)1. 2095 2096 Any person who violates this subsection commits a felony of the 2097 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 2098 or s. 775.084. 2099 (5)âACTS INVOLVING A MARIJUANA DELIVERY DEVICE.â 2100 (a)âA person 21 years of age or older may possess, use, 2101 transport, or deliver, without consideration, to another person 2102 21 years of age or older a marijuana delivery device as defined 2103 in s. 381.986. 2104 (b)âA person younger than 21 years of age who possesses, 2105 uses, transports, or delivers, without consideration, a 2106 marijuana delivery device as defined in s. 381.986 commits a 2107 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 2108 775.082 or s. 775.083 for a first conviction for a violation of 2109 this paragraph and a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable 2110 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083, for a second or 2111 subsequent conviction for a violation of this paragraph. 2112 Section 9.âSection 943.0586, Florida Statutes, is created 2113 to read: 2114 943.0586âCannabis expunction.â 2115 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 2116 (a)ââCannabisâ has the same meaning as provided in chapter 2117 893. 2118 (b)ââExpunctionâ has the same meaning and effect as 2119 provided in s. 943.0585. 2120 (c)ââFormer s. 893.13, Florida Statutes 2026,â is a 2121 reference to s. 893.13 as it existed at any time before January 2122 1, 2027. 2123 (2)âELIGIBILITY.âNotwithstanding any other law, a person is 2124 eligible to petition a court to expunge a criminal history 2125 record for the conviction for a violation of former s. 893.13, 2126 Florida Statutes 2026, if: 2127 (a)âThe person received a withholding of adjudication or an 2128 adjudication of guilt for a violation of former s. 893.13, 2129 Florida Statutes 2026, for the possession of cannabis; 2130 (b)âThe person possessed 4 ounces or less of cannabis; and 2131 (c)âThe person is no longer under court supervision related 2132 to the disposition of arrest or alleged criminal activity to 2133 which the petition to expunge pertains. 2134 (3)âCERTIFICATE OF ELIGIBILITY.âBefore petitioning a court 2135 to expunge a criminal history record under this section, a 2136 person seeking to expunge such record must apply to the 2137 department for a certificate of eligibility for expunction. The 2138 department shall adopt rules to establish procedures for 2139 applying for and issuing a certificate of eligibility for 2140 expunction. 2141 (a)âThe department shall issue a certificate of eligibility 2142 for expunction to a person who is the subject of a criminal 2143 history record under this section, if that person: 2144 1.âSatisfies the eligibility criteria in subsection (2); 2145 2.âHas submitted to the department a written certified 2146 statement from the appropriate state attorney or statewide 2147 prosecutor which confirms the criminal history record complies 2148 with the eligibility criteria in subsection (2); and 2149 3.âHas submitted to the department a certified copy of the 2150 disposition of the charge to which the petition to expunge 2151 pertains. 2152 (b)âA certificate of eligibility for expunction is valid 2153 for 12 months after the date of issuance stamped by the 2154 department on the certificate. After that time, the petitioner 2155 must reapply to the department for a new certificate of 2156 eligibility. The petitionerâs status and the law in effect at 2157 the time of the renewal application determine the petitionerâs 2158 eligibility. 2159 (4)âPETITION.âEach petition to expunge a criminal history 2160 record must be accompanied by: 2161 (a)âA valid certificate of eligibility issued by the 2162 department. 2163 (b)âThe petitionerâs sworn statement that he or she: 2164 1.âSatisfies the eligibility requirements for expunction in 2165 subsection (2); and 2166 2.âIs eligible for expunction to the best of his or her 2167 knowledge. 2168 (5)âPENALTY.âA person who knowingly provides false 2169 information on his or her sworn statement submitted with a 2170 petition to expunge commits a felony of the third degree, 2171 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 2172 (6)âCOURT AUTHORITY.â 2173 (a)âThe courts of this state have jurisdiction over their 2174 own procedures, including the maintenance, expunction, and 2175 correction of judicial records containing criminal history 2176 information, to the extent that such procedures are not 2177 inconsistent with the conditions, responsibilities, and duties 2178 established by this section. 2179 (b)âA court of competent jurisdiction shall order a 2180 criminal justice agency to expunge the criminal history record 2181 of a person who complies with this section. The court may not 2182 order a criminal justice agency to expunge a criminal history 2183 record under this section until the person seeking to expunge a 2184 criminal history record has applied for and received a 2185 certificate of eligibility under subsection (3). 2186 (c)âExpunction granted under this section does not preclude 2187 the person who receives such relief from petitioning for the 2188 expunction or sealing of a later criminal history record as 2189 provided for in ss. 943.0583, 943.0585, and 943.059, if the 2190 person is otherwise eligible under those sections. 2191 (7)âPROCESSING OF A PETITION OR AN ORDER.â 2192 (a)âIn judicial proceedings under this section, a copy of 2193 the completed petition to expunge must be served upon the 2194 appropriate state attorney or the statewide prosecutor and upon 2195 the arresting agency; however, it is not necessary to make any 2196 agency other than the state a party. The appropriate state 2197 attorney or the statewide prosecutor and the arresting agency 2198 may respond to the court regarding the completed petition to 2199 expunge. 2200 (b)âIf relief is granted by the court, the clerk of the 2201 court shall certify copies of the order to the appropriate state 2202 attorney or the statewide prosecutor and the arresting agency. 2203 The arresting agency shall forward the order to any other agency 2204 to which the arresting agency disseminated the criminal history 2205 record information to which the order pertains. The department 2206 shall forward the order to expunge to the Federal Bureau of 2207 Investigation. The clerk of the court shall certify a copy of 2208 the order to any other agency that the records of the court 2209 reflect has received the criminal history record from the court. 2210 (c)âThe department or any other criminal justice agency is 2211 not required to act on an order to expunge entered by a court if 2212 such order does not meet the requirements of this section. Upon 2213 receipt of such an order, the department shall notify the 2214 issuing court, the appropriate state attorney or statewide 2215 prosecutor, the petitioner or the petitionerâs attorney, and the 2216 arresting agency of the reason for noncompliance. The 2217 appropriate state attorney or statewide prosecutor shall take 2218 action within 60 days to correct the record and petition the 2219 court to void the order. No cause of action, including contempt 2220 of court, may arise against any criminal justice agency for 2221 failure to comply with an order to expunge if the petitioner for 2222 such order failed to obtain the certificate of eligibility as 2223 required by this section or such order does not otherwise meet 2224 the requirements of this section. 2225 (8)âEFFECT OF CANNABIS EXPUNCTION ORDER.â 2226 (a)âThe person who is the subject of a criminal history 2227 record that is expunged under this section may lawfully deny or 2228 fail to acknowledge any arrest or conviction covered by the 2229 expunged record, except if the person who is the subject of the 2230 record: 2231 1.âIs a candidate for employment with a criminal justice 2232 agency; 2233 2.âIs a defendant in a criminal prosecution; 2234 3.âConcurrently or subsequently petitions for relief under 2235 this section, s. 943.0583, s. 943.0585, or s. 943.059; 2236 4.âIs a candidate for admission to The Florida Bar; 2237 5.âIs seeking to be employed or licensed by or to contract 2238 with the Department of Children and Families, the Division of 2239 Vocational Rehabilitation within the Department of Education, 2240 the Agency for Health Care Administration, the Agency for 2241 Persons with Disabilities, the Department of Health, the 2242 Department of Elderly Affairs, or the Department of Juvenile 2243 Justice or to be employed or used by such contractor or licensee 2244 in a sensitive position having direct contact with children, 2245 persons with disabilities, or the elderly; 2246 6.âIs seeking to be employed or licensed by the Department 2247 of Education, any district school board, any university 2248 laboratory school, any charter school, any private or parochial 2249 school, or any local governmental entity that licenses child 2250 care facilities; 2251 7.âIs seeking to be licensed by the Division of Insurance 2252 Agent and Agency Services within the Department of Financial 2253 Services; or 2254 8.âIs seeking to be appointed as a guardian pursuant to s. 2255 744.3125. 2256 (b)âA person who has been granted an expunction under this 2257 section and who is authorized under paragraph (a) to lawfully 2258 deny or fail to acknowledge the arrests and convictions covered 2259 by an expunged record may not be held under any law of this 2260 state to have committed perjury or to be otherwise liable for 2261 giving a false statement by reason of his or her failure to 2262 recite or acknowledge an expunged criminal history record. 2263 Section 10.âSection 893.15, Florida Statutes, is amended to 2264 read: 2265 893.15âRehabilitation.âAny person who violates s. 2266 893.13(6)(a) or (b) relating to possession may, in the 2267 discretion of the trial judge, be required to participate in a 2268 substance abuse services program approved or regulated by the 2269 Department of Children and Families pursuant to the provisions 2270 of chapter 397, provided the director of such program approves 2271 the placement of the defendant in such program. Such required 2272 participation shall be imposed in addition to any penalty or 2273 probation otherwise prescribed by law. However, the total time 2274 of such penalty, probation, and program participation may shall 2275 not exceed the maximum length of sentence possible for the 2276 offense. 2277 Section 11.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 2278 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon 2279 becoming a law, this act shall take effect January 1, 2027.